District of Columbia statutes.
7-1303.03

Application by individual for out-patient nonresidential habilitation.

Any individual 14 years of age or older who has an intellectual disability, may have an intellectual disability, or has been diagnosed with an intellectual disability may apply to any hospital, clinic or facility, or other community-based service owned or operated by, or under contract with, the District for out-patient nonresidential habilitation. Applications shall be made to the Director of the hospital, clinic, facility or service, or to the Department on Disability Services. If an application is filed with a Director and the Director determines that the particular hospital, clinic, facility or community-based service cannot provide the necessary habilitation, he or she shall refer the individual to the Department on Disability Services, and the Department on Disability Services shall assist the individual in locating a facility, hospital, clinic or service which can provide the necessary habilitation.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 303, 25 DCR 5094
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 301(b), 54 DCR 818
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 26(e), 53 DCR 6198
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 17(g), 59 DCR 5567
1981 Ed., § 6-1923.
1973 Ed., § 6-1656.
D.C. Law 16-264 substituted “Department on Disability Services” for “Department of Human Services” throughout the section.
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “has mental retardation, may have mental retardation, or has been diagnosed with mental retardation” for “is, may be, or has been diagnosed mentally retarded”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “an intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” wherever it appears in the section.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 301(b) of Developmental Disabilities Services Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-672, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1155).
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.